North Dakota statutes. TITLE 65 Workforce Safety and Insurance
CHAPTER 65-05 Claims and Compensation
65-05-28.
Examination of injured employee — Paid expenses — No compensation paid if injured employee refuses to reasonably participate.

An injured employee may select a health care provider of that injured employee’s choice to render initial treatment. Upon a determination that the injured employee’s injury is compensable, the organization may require the injured employee to begin treating with another health care provider to better direct the medical aspects of the injured employee’s claim. The organization shall provide a list of three health care providers who specialize in the treatment of the type of injury the employee sustained. At the organization’s request, the injured employee shall select a health care provider from the list. An injured employee shall follow the directives of the health care provider treating the injured employee as chosen by the injured employee at the request of the organization and comply with all reasonable requests during the time the injured employee is under medical care. Providing further that:

An injured employee may not change from one health care provider to another while under treatment or after being released, without the prior written authorization of the organization. Failure to obtain approval of the organization renders the injured employee liable for the cost of treatment and the new health care provider will not be considered the attending health care provider for purposes of certifying temporary disability.

Any injured employee requesting a change of health care provider shall file a written request with the organization stating all reasons for the change. Upon receipt of the request, the organization shall review the injured employee’s claim and approve or deny the change of health care provider, notifying the injured employee and the requested health care provider.

Emergency care or treatment or referral by the attending health care provider does not constitute a change of health care provider and does not require prior approval of the organization.

Travel and other personal reimbursement for seeking and obtaining medical care is paid only upon request of the injured employee. All claims for reimbursement must be supported by the original vendor receipt, when appropriate, and must be submitted within one year of the date the expense was incurred or reimbursement must be denied. Reimbursement must be made at the organization reimbursement rates in effect on the date of incurred travel or expense. The calculation for reimbursement for travel by motor vehicle must be calculated using miles actually and necessarily traveled. A personal reimbursement requested under this subsection is a managed care decision under section 65-02-20, subject to the appeal process as provided for in section 65-02-20. Providing further that:

Payment for mileage or other travel expenses may not be made when the distance traveled is less than fifty miles [80.47 kilometers] one way, unless the total mileage equals or exceeds two hundred miles [321.87 kilometers] in a calendar month;

All travel reimbursements are payable at the rates at which state employees are paid per diem and mileage, except that the organization may pay no more than actual cost of lodging, if actual cost is less;

Reimbursement may not be paid for travel other than that necessary to obtain the closest available medical or hospital care needed for the injury. If the injured employee chooses to seek medical treatment outside a local area where care is available, travel reimbursement may be denied;

Reimbursement may not be paid for the travel and associated expenses incurred by the injured employee’s spouse, children, or other persons unless the injured employee’s injury prevents travel alone and the inability is medically substantiated; and

Other expenses, including telephone calls and car rentals are not reimbursable expenses.

The organization may at any time require an injured employee to submit to an independent medical examination or independent medical review by one or more duly qualified allied health care professionals designated or approved by the organization. The organization shall make a reasonable effort to designate a duly qualified allied health care professional licensed in the state in which the injured employee resides to conduct the examination before designating a duly qualified allied health care professional licensed in another state or shall make a reasonable effort to designate a duly qualified allied health care professional licensed in a state other than the injured employee’s state of residence if the examination is conducted at a site within two hundred seventy-five miles [442.57 kilometers] from the injured employee’s residence. An independent medical examination and independent medical review must be for the purpose of review of the diagnosis, prognosis, treatment, or fees. An independent medical examination contemplates an actual examination of an injured employee, either in person or remotely if appropriate. An independent medical review contemplates a file review of an injured employee’s records, including treatments and testing. The injured employee may have a duly qualified health care provider designated by that employee present at the examination or later review the written report of the allied health care professional performing the independent medical examination, if procured and paid for by that injured employee. Providing further that:

In case of any disagreement between allied health care professionals making an examination on the part of the organization and the injured employee’s allied health care professional, the organization shall appoint an impartial allied health care professional duly qualified who shall make an examination and shall report to the organization.

The injured employee, in the discretion of the organization, may be paid reasonable travel and other per diem expenses under the guidelines of subsection 2. If the injured employee is working and loses gross wages from the injured employee’s employer for attending the examination, the gross wages must be reimbursed as a miscellaneous expense upon receipt of a signed statement from the employer verifying the gross wage loss.

If an injured employee, or the injured employee’s representative, refuses to submit to, or in any way intentionally obstructs, any examination or treatment, or refuses to reasonably participate in medical or other treatments or examinations, the injured employee is medically noncompliant. If the organization determines an injured employee is medically noncompliant without good cause, the organization shall discontinue disability and vocational rehabilitation benefits. At any time the injured employee is medically noncompliant, efforts by the injured employee to come into compliance are not considered successful compliance until the injured employee has been compliant for a period of at least sixty days. If the period of medical noncompliance continues for sixty days following the date disability and vocational rehabilitation benefits are discontinued, or a second instance of medical noncompliance occurs without good cause, the organization may not pay any further disability and vocational rehabilitation benefits, regardless of whether the injured employee sustained a significant change in medical condition due to the work injury. The period of noncompliance must be deducted from the period for which compensation is payable to the injured employee.

If an injured employee undertakes activities, whether or not in the course of employment, which exceed the treatment recommendations of the injured employee’s health care provider regarding the work injury, and the health care provider determines the employee’s injury or condition has been aggravated or has worsened as a result of the injured employee’s activities, the organization may not pay benefits relative to the aggravation or worsening, unless the activities were undertaken at the demand of an employer. An employer’s account may not be charged with the expenses of an aggravation or worsening of a work-related injury or condition unless the employer knowingly required the injured employee to perform activities that exceed the treatment recommendations of the injured employee’s health care provider.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, § 16; 1925 Supp., § 396a16; S.L. 1941, ch. 305, § 5; R.C. 1943, § 65-0528; S.L. 1973, ch. 513, § 1; 1975, ch. 584, § 9; 1977, ch. 579, § 21; 1989, ch. 765, § 6; 1989, ch. 766, § 8; 1991, ch. 714, § 50; 1995, ch. 625, § 1; 1999, ch. 550, § 2; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2009, ch. 615, § 2; 2009, ch. 623, § 1; 2009, ch. 624, § 1; 2011, ch. 512, § 5; 2017, ch. 439, § 3, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 523, § 12, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 525, § 8, effective July 1, 2019.

65-05-28.1.
Employer to select preferred provider.

Notwithstanding section 65-05-28, any employer subject to this title may select a preferred provider to render medical treatment to employees who sustain compensable injuries. “Preferred provider” means a designated provider or group of providers of medical services, including consultations or referral by the provider or providers.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 626, § 1; 2003, ch. 564, § 9; 2007, ch. 569, § 5.

Law Reviews.

Are Employees Obtaining “Sure and Certain Relief” Under the 1995 Legislative Enactments of the North Dakota Workers’ Compensation Act?, 72 N.D. L. Rev. 349 (1996).

65-05-28.2.
Preferred provider — Use required — Exceptions — Notice.

During the first thirty days after a work injury, an employee of an employer that has selected a preferred provider under this section may seek medical treatment only from the preferred provider for the injury. Treatment by a provider other than the preferred provider is not compensable and the organization may not pay for treatment by a provider who is not a preferred provider, unless a referral was made by the preferred provider. A provider who is not a preferred provider may not certify disability or render an opinion about any matter pertaining to the injury, including causation, compensability, impairment, or disability. This section does not apply to emergency care nor to any care the employee reasonably did not know was related to a work injury.

An employee of an employer that has selected a preferred provider may elect to be treated by a different provider provided the employee makes the election and notifies the employer in writing before the occurrence of an injury.

After thirty days have passed following the injury, the employee may make a written request to the organization to change providers. The employee shall make the request and serve it on the employer and the organization at least thirty days before treatment by the provider. The employee shall state the reasons for the request and the employee’s choice of provider.

If the employer objects to the provider selected by the employee under subsection 2 or 3, the employer may file an objection to the change of provider. The employer shall detail in the objection the grounds for the objection and shall serve the objection on the employee and the organization within five days of service of the request. The employee may serve, within five days of service of the employer’s objection, a written response on the employer and the organization in support of the request for change of provider. Within fifteen days after receipt of the response or of the expiration of the time for filing the response, the organization shall rule on the request. Failure of the organization to rule constitutes approval of the request. Treatment by the employee’s chosen provider is not compensable until the organization approves the request. The preferred provider remains the treating provider until the organization approves the employee’s request to change providers.

An employer that selects a preferred provider shall give notice and post notice as required under this subsection.

An employer shall give written notice of the identity and the terms of the preferred provider program:

To the employer’s employees when the employer makes an initial selection of a preferred provider.

To the employer’s employees when the employer changes the selection of the preferred provider.

To an employee at the time of hire.

To the employer’s employees at least annually after the initial notice.

An employer that has selected a preferred provider shall display notice of the identity of the preferred provider and the terms of the preferred provider program in a conspicuous manner at fixed worksites, and wherever feasible at mobile worksites, and in a sufficient number of places to reasonably inform employees of the identity of the preferred provider and of the terms of the preferred provider program.

Failure to give written notice, to properly post notice, or to reasonably inform employees of the terms of the preferred provider program as required under this subsection invalidates the selection for the employee’s claim.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 626, § 2; 1999, ch. 550, § 3; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2009, ch. 625, § 1; 2013, ch. 505, § 1.

65-05-29.
Assignment of claims void — Claims exempt.

Any assignment of a claim for compensation under this title is void. All compensation and claims therefor are exempt from claims of creditors except any of the following:

A child support obligation ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction.

A claim by job service North Dakota for reimbursement of unemployment benefits, for the amount that was paid by job service North Dakota during the period for which the claimant is found eligible for temporary total or permanent total disability benefits, not to exceed the disability award actually made by the organization.

A claim by the organization for any payments made due to:

Clerical error, mistake of identity, innocent misrepresentation by or on behalf of the recipient, or any other circumstance of a similar nature, all not induced by fraud, in which cases the recipient shall repay it or recoupment of any unpaid amount may be made from any future payments due to the recipient on any claim with the organization;

An adjudication by the organization or by order of any court, if the final decision is that the payment was made under an erroneous adjudication, in which cases the recipient shall repay it or recoupment of any unpaid amount may be made from any future payments due to the recipient on any claim with the organization;

Fraud, in which case the recipient shall repay the payment or the unpaid amount of the sum may be recouped from any future payments due to the recipient on any claim with the organization;

Overpayment due to application of section 65-05-09.1; or

A claim by the organization for premiums, penalties, and interest under chapter 65-04.

Notwithstanding paragraph 2 of subdivision c of subsection 1, during the sixty days immediately following the date of injury, if the organization accrues a health care provider expense or makes a payment for a medical expense and the organization later determines the medical expense is for the care and treatment of a noncompensable injury, disease, or other condition, the injured employee is not liable for the medical expense accrued or paid by the organization before the earlier of:

The third day following the date the organization makes a determination the medical expense is for a noncompensable injury, disease, or condition; or

The third day following the date the injured employee or medical provider reasonably should have known the medical expense is for a noncompensable injury, disease, or condition.

Medical expenses incurred under this subsection may not be charged against an employer’s account for purposes of experience rating.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, § 22; 1925 Supp., § 396a22; R.C. 1943, § 65-0529; S.L. 1987, ch. 755, § 1; 1989, ch. 766, § 9; 1991, ch. 54, § 31; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2009, ch. 611, § 11; 2009, ch. 626, § 1; 2013, ch. 502, § 4; 2019, ch. 523, § 13, effective August 1, 2019.

65-05-30.
Filing of claim constitutes consent to use of information received by health care provider.

The filing of a claim with the organization constitutes a consent to the use by the organization, in any proceeding by the organization or to which the organization is a party in any court, of any information, including prior and subsequent prognosis reports, medical records, medical bills, and other information concerning any health care or health care services which was received by any health care provider, hospital, or clinic in the course of any examination or treatment of the claimant.

The filing of a claim with the organization authorizes a health care provider, hospital, or clinic to disclose to the organization, or authorized representative of the organization, information or render an opinion regarding the injured employee’s claim with the organization. As used in this subsection, an opinion may include a statement regarding liability, causation, or a pre-existing condition or other information the organization deems necessary for the administration of this title. The filing of a claim with the organization authorizes a health care provider, hospital, or clinic to disclose any information to the organization deemed necessary for the administration of this title to the organization’s representative, or the employer, except any information directly disclosed to the employer must be relevant to the employee’s work injury or to return-to-work issues.

If a health care provider furnishes information or an opinion under this section:

That health care provider does not incur any liability as a result of furnishing that information or opinion.

The act of furnishing that information or opinion may not be the sole basis for a disciplinary or other proceeding affecting professional licensure. However, the act of furnishing that information or opinion may be considered in conjunction with another action that may subject the health care provider to a disciplinary or other proceeding affecting professional licensure.

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 305, § 4; R.C. 1943, § 65-0530; S.L. 1977, ch. 579, § 22; 1989, ch. 766, § 10; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2005, ch. 610, § 5; 2015, ch. 481, § 1, effective March 19, 2015; 2019, ch. 523, § 14, effective August 1, 2019.

65-05-31.
False statement — Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

65-05-32.
Privacy of records and hearings — Penalty.

Information contained in the claim files and records of injured employees is confidential and is not open to public inspection, other than to organization employees or agents in the performance of their official duties. Providing further that:

Representatives of a claimant, whether an individual or an organization, may review a claim file or receive specific information from the file upon the presentation of the signed authorization of the claimant. However, reserve information may not be made available to the claimant or the claimant’s representatives. Availability of this information to employers is subject to the sole discretion of the organization.

Employers or their duly authorized representatives who are required to have access to an injured employee’s claim file for the performance of their duties may review and have access to any files of their own injured employees. An employer or an employer’s duly authorized representative who willfully communicates information contained in an employee’s claim file to any person who does not need the information in the performance of that person’s duties is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Allied health care professionals treating or examining employees claiming benefits under this title, or allied health care professionals giving medical advice to the organization regarding any claim may, at the discretion of the organization, inspect the claim files and records of injured employees.

If an injured employee is deceased or is unable to communicate with the organization, the organization may provide the claim file to and communicate with relevant interested parties to properly adjudicate benefits.

Other persons may have access to and make inspections of the files, if such persons are rendering assistance to the organization at any stage of the proceedings on any matter pertaining to the administration of this title.

The claimant’s name; date of birth; injury date; employer name; type of injury; whether the claim is accepted, denied, or pending; and whether the claim is in active or inactive pay status will be available to the public. This information may not be released in aggregate form, except to those persons contracting with the organization for exchange of information pertaining to the administration of this title or except upon written authorization by the claimant for a specified purpose.

At the request of a claimant, the organization may close the medical portion of a hearing to the public.

The organization may release the social security number of an individual claiming entitlement to benefits under this title to health care providers or health care facilities for the purpose of adjudicating a claim for benefits.

The organization may provide an injured employee’s insurer information regarding the injured employee’s claim.

The organization may provide any state or federal agency any information obtained pursuant to the administration of this title. Any information so provided must be used for the purpose of administering the duties of that state or federal agency.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 579, § 1; 1989, ch. 766, § 11; 1993, ch. 620, § 4; 2001, ch. 575, § 3; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2005, ch. 610, § 6; 2007, ch. 574, § 1; 2015, ch. 480, § 5, effective August 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 523, § 15, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 500, § 8, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 13 of chapter 500, S.L. 2021, provides in part, “

APPLICATION.

This Act applies to all claims regardless of date of injury.”

Law Reviews.

Evidence in Workmen’s Compensation Cases, Daniel E. Buchanan, 54 N.D. L. Rev. 173 (1977).

65-05-33.
Filing false claim or false statement — Penalty.

A person who claims benefits or payment for services under this title or the employer of a person who claims benefits or payments for services is guilty of a class A misdemeanor if the person or employer does any one or more of the following:

Willfully files a false claim or makes a false statement or an omission in an attempt to secure payment of benefits or payment for services.

Willfully misrepresents that person’s physical condition, including deceptive conduct which misrepresents that person’s physical ability.

Has a claim for disability benefits that has been accepted by the organization and willfully fails to notify the organization of:

Work or other activities as required under subsection 3 of section 65-05-08;

The receipt of income from work; or

An increase in income from work.

If any of the acts or omissions in subsection 1 are committed to obtain, or pursuant to a scheme to obtain, more than one thousand dollars in benefits or payment for services, the offense is a class C felony.

In addition to any other penalties provided by law, the person claiming benefits or payment for services in violation of this section shall reimburse the organization for any benefits paid based upon the false claim, false statement, or omission, and, if applicable, under section 65-05-29 and shall forfeit any additional benefits relative to that injury.

For purposes of this section, “statement” includes any testimony, claim form, notice, proof of injury, proof of return-to-work status, bill for services, diagnosis, prescription, hospital or doctor records, x-ray, test results, or other evidence of loss, injury, or expense.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 643, § 1; 1989, ch. 766, § 12; 1991, ch. 714, § 51; 1995, ch. 616, § 6; 1997, ch. 534, § 4; 2001, ch. 576, § 2; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2017, ch. 439, § 4, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 500, § 9, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 13 of chapter 500, S.L. 2021, provides in part, “

APPLICATION.

This Act applies to all claims regardless of date of injury.”

Cross-References.

Falsification in governmental matters, see N.D.C.C. ch. 12.1-11.

65-05-34.
False statement on employment application.

A false statement in an employment application made by an employee bars all benefits under this title if:

The employee knowingly and willfully made a false representation as to the employee’s physical condition;

The employer relied upon the false representation and this reliance was a substantial factor in the hiring; and

There was a causal connection between the false representation and the injury.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 714, § 52.

Collateral References.

Eligibility for workers’ compensation as affected by claimant’s misrepresentation of health or physical condition at time of hiring, 12 A.L.R.5th 658.

65-05-35.
Closed claim — Presumption.

A claim for benefits under this title is presumed closed if the organization has not paid any benefit for a period of four years.

A claim that is presumed closed may not be reopened for payment of any further benefits unless the presumption is rebutted by clear and convincing evidence that the work injury is the primary cause of the current symptoms.

With respect to a claim that has been presumed closed, the employee shall provide the organization written notice of reapplication for benefits under that claim. In case of award of lost-time benefits, the award may commence no more than thirty days before the date of reapplication. In case of award of medical benefits, the award may be for medical services incurred no more than thirty days before the date of reapplication.

This section applies to all claims for injury, irrespective of injury date.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 714, § 53; 1995, ch. 627, § 1; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2007, ch. 575, § 1; 2021, ch. 500, § 10, effective August 1, 2021.

65-05-36.
Preferred worker program — Continuing appropriation.

For purposes of this section, “preferred worker” means a worker who has incurred a compensable injury that resulted in a disability that poses a substantial obstacle to employment. The organization may provide assistance as determined appropriate to preferred workers or employers who employ a preferred worker. In addition, employers who apply for and are approved as a preferred worker employer may not be assessed premiums on a preferred worker’s salary for three years from the date of hiring. The organization may not charge claims costs incurred as a result of an injury sustained by a preferred worker against the preferred worker’s employer’s account during the first three years after the worker is hired. The organization shall charge those claims costs to the general fund. The organization may adopt rules to regulate and manage the preferred worker program authorized by this section. An employer or preferred worker may not appeal an organization decision not to provide assistance to that employer or preferred worker under this section. Money in the workforce safety and insurance fund is appropriated on a continuing basis to provide the assistance authorized under this section.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 575, § 4; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2003, ch. 562, § 11.

65-05-37.
Retaliation by employer prohibited — Action for damages — Penalty.

An employer who willfully discharges or willfully threatens to discharge an employee for seeking or making known the intention to seek workforce safety and insurance benefits is liable in a civil action for damages incurred by the employee, including reasonable attorney’s fees. Damages awarded under this section may not be offset by any workforce safety and insurance benefits to which the employee is entitled. A willful violation of this section is a class A misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 562, § 12.

65-05-38.
Death of permanently and totally disabled employee — Surviving spouse.

In the case of the death of an injured employee who is receiving permanent total disability benefits, or additional benefits payable, if the injured employee was permanently and totally disabled for at least ten years and was married to the surviving spouse for at least ten years, the decedent’s surviving spouse is eligible to receive no more than six months of the decedent’s permanent total disability benefits, supplementary benefits, and additional benefits payable in the same manner as the deceased spouse would have been entitled to receive the benefits. A surviving spouse is eligible for benefits under this section if the organization approved the decedent for home health care services and reimbursed the surviving spouse for providing the home health care services. The surviving spouse is not eligible for benefits under this section if the surviving spouse is eligible for benefits under section 65-05-16. The eligibility of the surviving spouse to receive benefits under this section terminates upon the remarriage of the surviving spouse.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 627, § 1.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2009.

65-05-39.
Chronic opioid therapy coverage and monitoring.

As used in this section, “chronic opioid therapy” is opioid treatment extending beyond ninety days from initiation which is for the treatment of pain resulting from a nonmalignant, compensable condition or therapies for another nonterminal compensable condition.

In order to qualify for payment for chronic opioid therapy:

Chronic opioid therapy must result in an increase in function, enable an injured employee to resume working, or improve pain control without debilitating side effects;

Chronic opioid therapy must treat an injured employee:

Who has been nonresponsive to non-opioid treatment;

Who is not using illegal substances or abusing alcohol; and

Who is compliant with the treatment protocol; and

The prescriber of chronic opioid therapy shall provide to the organization:

At least every ninety days, documentation of the effectiveness of the chronic opioid therapy, including documentation of improvements in function or improvements in pain control without debilitating side effects; and

A treatment agreement between the injured employee and the prescriber which restricts treatment access and limits prescriptions to one identified single prescriber. This paragraph does not preclude temporary coverage within a single clinic by an identified prescriber when the prescriber of record is unavailable and does not preclude a referral to a pain specialist.

At the prescriber’s or organization’s request, an injured employee on chronic opioid therapy is subject to random drug testing for the presence of prescribed and illicit substances. Failure of the test or of timely compliance with the request may result in termination of chronic opioid therapy coverage.

Failure to comply with any of the conditions under this section may result in the termination of coverage for chronic opioid therapy.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 482, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

65-05-40.
Opioid therapy and benzodiazepine duration limits — Termination of coverage.

The organization may not pay for opioid therapy that exceeds ninety morphine milligram equivalents of opioid medication per day, or more than a seven-day supply of an opioid medication within any single outpatient transaction during the initial thirty-day period of opioid therapy.

The limitations do not apply to:

Opioid therapy prescribed for active and aftercare cancer treatment;

End-of-life and hospice care;

Treatment for substance use disorder;

An emergency room setting;

An inpatient hospital setting;

A long-term care facility setting; or

An assisted living facility setting.

Opioid therapy includes controlled substances listed in subsections 3 and 4 of section 19-03.1-07, subsection 6 of section 19-03.1-09, subsection 3 of section 19-03.1-11, subsections 3 and 4 of section 19-03.1-13, or any substance with similar properties or affects.

The organization may not pay for benzodiazepine therapy beyond a cumulative duration of four weeks, except when approved by the organization for the treatment of an anxiety disorder. Benzodiazepine therapy includes controlled substances contained in subdivisions a, i, j, k, l, p, r, v, x, ee, mm, qq, xx, yy, aaa, and ccc of subsection 4 of section 19-03.1-11, or any substance with similar properties or affects.

The organization may not pay for any combination therapies that include controlled substances from subsections 1 and 2 concurrently.

A review of requests to depart from the established limits in subsections 1, 2, and 3, upon a showing of medical necessity, are dispute resolution decisions under section 65-02-20.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 504, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.